New York, session 2025-2026, S1500.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 1180-a of the vehicle and traffic law, as amended 2 by chapter 464 of the laws of 2003, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 1180-a. Maximum speed limits. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision 4 of law, no city, village, town, county, public authority, division, 5 office or department of the state shall maintain or create (a) any speed 6 limit in excess of fifty-five miles per hour on any road, highway, park- 7 way or bridge or (b) any speed limit on any other portion of a public 8 highway, which is not uniformly applicable to all types of motor vehi- 9 cles using such portion of highway, if on November first, nineteen 10 hundred seventy-three, such portion of highway had a speed limit which 11 was uniformly applicable to all types of motor vehicles using it; 12 provided however, a lower speed limit may be established for any vehicle 13 operating under a special permit because of any weight or dimension of 14 such vehicle, including any load thereon, and (c) provided further, 15 paragraph (b) of this subdivision shall not apply to any portion of a 16 highway during such time that the condition of the highway, weather, an 17 accident, or other condition creates a temporary hazard to the safety of 18 traffic on such portion of a highway. However, the commissioner of the 19 department of transportation may establish a maximum speed limit of not 20 more than [sixty-five] seventy miles per hour on any state roadway which 21 meets department criteria for such maximum speed. 22 2. Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraphs (a) and (b) of subdi- 23 vision one of this section, upon The Governor Thomas E. Dewey Thruway as 24 such term is defined in section three hundred fifty-six of the public 25 authorities law, the New York state thruway authority may establish a 26 maximum speed limit of not more than [sixty-five] seventy miles per hour 27 provided that such maximum allowable speed limit is established in 28 accordance with all applicable rules and regulations. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04398-01-5 S. 1500 2 1 3. Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraphs (a) and (b) of subdi- 2 vision one of this section, upon (a) the southern tier expressway from a 3 point east of the town of Lowman, in the county of Chemung, thence 4 generally westerly to the Pennsylvania border and from the Chemung 5 interchange to New York touring route twenty-six, (b) interstate route 6 eighty-one from the Pennsylvania border in Broome county to the inter- 7 change with New York state touring route twelve in Jefferson county, (c) 8 the Adirondack northway portion of interstate route eighty-seven from 9 the interchange with Crescent Road in Saratoga county to the province of 10 Quebec, (d) interstate route eighty-eight from the interchange with New 11 York state touring route three hundred sixty-nine in Broome county to 12 the interchange with interstate route ninety in Schenectady county, (e) 13 interstate route three hundred ninety, known as the Genesee Expressway, 14 from the interchange with the southern tier expressway in Steuben county 15 to the interchange with interstate route four hundred ninety in Monroe 16 county, (f) interstate route four hundred ninety from interstate ninety 17 exit forty-five in Ontario county to the city of Rochester in Monroe 18 county and from interstate ninety exit forty-seven in Genesee county to 19 the city of Rochester in Monroe county, (g) interstate route five 20 hundred ninety from the interchange with interstate route three hundred 21 ninety in Monroe county to the interchange with interstate route four 22 hundred ninety in Monroe county, (h) route seventeen from the inter- 23 change with New York touring route three hundred ninety-four to the 24 Pennsylvania border, (i) interstate route four hundred eighty-one from 25 the southerly interchange with interstate route eighty-one in Onondaga 26 county to the northerly interchange with interstate route eighty-one in 27 Onondaga county, (j) New York state touring route four hundred eighty- 28 one from the northerly interchange with interstate route eighty-one in 29 Onondaga county to the city of Fulton in Oswego county, (k) interstate 30 ninety from exit eight, in the county of Rensselaer, thence generally 31 easterly to the interchange with the Berkshire section of The Governor 32 Thomas E. Dewey Thruway, (l) interstate route six hundred ninety, from 33 the city of Syracuse and town of Geddes border, thence generally wester- 34 ly to the interchange with the New York state thruway, (m) New York 35 state touring route six hundred ninety, from the interchange with the 36 New York state thruway, thence generally westerly to its intersection 37 with New York state touring route forty-eight in the town of Lysander, 38 (n) New York state touring route six hundred ninety-five, from the 39 interchange with interstate route six hundred ninety approximately 2.3 40 miles to the interchange with New York state touring route five, (o) New 41 York state touring route five from the interchange with New York state 42 touring route six hundred ninety-five approximately 5.0 miles to the 43 interchange with New York state touring route one hundred seventy-four 44 in the town of Camillus, and (p) route five hundred thirty-one from the 45 interchange with interstate route four hundred ninety in Monroe county 46 to the interchange with route thirty-six in Monroe county, and (q) 47 United States route two hundred nineteen, from the interchange with 48 Armor Duelles Road in the town of Orchard Park, thence generally south- 49 erly to the interchange with New York state route thirty-nine in the 50 town of Concord, the commissioner of the department of transportation 51 may establish a maximum speed limit of not more than [sixty-five] seven- 52 ty miles per hour provided that such maximum allowable speed limit is 53 established in accordance with all applicable rules and regulations. 54 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.